Utah statutes.
70D-2-304.   Statement to be provided.
(1)  Unless a servicer regularly provides the information described in this
Subsection (1) in a monthly statement to a mortgagor, the servicer shall
deliver to a mortgagor, within 15 days after receipt of a written request, a
statement of the mortgagor's account including the following information:
(a)  the date and amount of the payments credited to the account within the
previous 12-month period;
(b)  the balance in any escrow account held by the servicer; and
(c)  the total unpaid balance of the mortgage loan.
(2)  A servicer shall provide the first two statements requested for an
account in a 12-month period without charge.  If more than two statements are
requested for the same account in a 12-month period, the servicer may charge a
reasonable fee for an additional statement.
